Connecticut, session 2026, HB05383.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of section 7-313p of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(5) "State employer" means the state of Connecticut, including any
agency or department of the state, any board of trustees of a state-owned
or supported college or university and branches thereof, the
Connecticut Airport Authority, the Tweed-New Haven Airport
Authority and any entity that contracts with the Tweed-New Haven
Airport Authority; and
Sec. 2. Section 7-313g of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
For purposes of this section and sections 3-123, 7-313h to 7-313k
inclusive, and 29-303, "firefighter" shall include any (1) local fire
marshal, deputy fire marshal, fire investigator, fire inspector and such
other classes of inspectors and investigators for whom the State Fire

House Bill No. 5383
Marshal and the Codes and Standards Committee, acting jointly, have
adopted minimum standards of qualification pursuant to section 29-298;
and (2) uniformed member of a paid municipal, state or volunteer fire
department or of the Connecticut Airport Authority, the Tweed-New
Haven Airport Authority and any entity that contracts with the Tweed-
New Haven Airport Authority.
Sec. 3. Subdivision (3) of subsection (h) of section 31-225a of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(3) The statement of charges provided for in subdivision (2) of this
subsection shall constitute notice to the employer that it has been
determined that the benefits reported in such statement were properly
payable under this chapter to the claimants for the weeks and in the
amounts shown in such statements. If the employer contends that
benefits have been improperly charged due to fraud or error, a written
protest setting forth reasons therefor shall be filed with the
administrator not later than forty days [of] after the date the quarterly
statement was provided. An eligibility issue shall not be reopened on
the basis of such quarterly statement if notification of such eligibility
issue had previously been given to the employer under the provisions
of section 31-241, and he or she failed to file a timely appeal therefrom
or had the issue finally resolved against him or her.
Sec. 4. Subsection (a) of section 31-40cc of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Each physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse having knowledge of any person whom such
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
suspects is suffering from an illness related to the exposure of lead,
phosphorus, arsenic, brass, wood alcohol or mercury or their
Public Act No. 26-34 2 of 3

House Bill No. 5383
compounds, anthrax or compressed air, or any other disease contracted
as a result of the nature of the occupation of such person, shall, not later
than forty-eight hours [of] after discovery of such suspected
occupational disease, provide the Labor Department, in a form and
manner prescribed by the department, a report stating (1) the name,
address and occupation of such person, (2) the name, address and
business of such person's employer, (3) the nature of the disease, and (4)
any other information required by the department. Any physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse who fails to
provide the report required pursuant to this section or who fails to send
such report within the time period prescribed by this section may be
assessed a civil penalty of not more than ten dollars by the Labor
Commissioner. No report made pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall be admissible as evidence in any civil action or for a
workers' compensation claim under chapter 568.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Public Act No. 26-34 3 of 3